Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-268
Right to distribution; remedies; record date.

At the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, he or she has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution. A partnership agreement may provide for the establishment of a record date with respect to allocations and distributions by a limited partnership.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 36;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 41.